dev/adjective/adjective.bn.dix
  <!-- সস্তা; সস্তা -->
    <pardef n="সস্তা__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- দিনব্যাপী; দিনব্যাপী -->
    <pardef n="দিনব্যাপী__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- উত্তর-পূর্ব; উত্তর-পূর্ব -->
    <pardef n="উত্তর-পূর্ব__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- দ্বিবার্ষিক; দ্বিবার্ষিক -->
    <pardef n="দ্বিবার্ষিক__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- প্রতিভাবান; প্রতিভাবান -->
    <pardef n="প্রতিভাবান__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- মধ্যবর্তী; মধ্যবর্তী -->
    <pardef n="মধ্যবর্তী__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- সম্পন্ন; সম্পন্ন -->
    <pardef n="সম্পন্ন__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- অষ্টম; অষ্টম -->
    <pardef n="অষ্টম__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- শুভ; শুভ -->
    <pardef n="শুভ__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- আনন্দিত; আনন্দিত -->
    <pardef n="আনন্দিত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- মসৃণ; মসৃণ -->
    <pardef n="মসৃণ__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- বিশ্বাসী; বিশ্বাসী -->
    <pardef n="বিশ্বাসী__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- নিয়োজিত; নিয়োজিত -->
    <pardef n="নিয়োজিত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- অযোগ্য; অযোগ্য -->
    <pardef n="অযোগ্য__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ঘৃণ্যতম; ঘৃণ্য -->
    <pardef n="ঘৃণ্য/তম__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>তম<s n="adj"/><s n="psint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- বেসামরিক; বেসামরিক -->
    <pardef n="বেসামরিক__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- মুসলিম; মুসলিম -->
    <pardef n="মুসলিম__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- বিতর্কিত; বিতর্কিত -->
    <pardef n="বিতর্কিত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- পুরো; পুরো -->
    <pardef n="পুরো__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- যোগ্যতম; যোগ্য -->
    <pardef n="যোগ্য/তম__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>তম<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- জনপ্রিয়; জনপ্রিয় -->
    <pardef n="জনপ্রিয়__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- সহজাত; সহজাত -->
    <pardef n="সহজাত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- সচ্ছল; সচ্ছল -->
    <pardef n="সচ্ছল__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- প্রদর্শিত; প্রদর্শিত -->
    <pardef n="প্রদর্শিত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- নিরপেক্ষ; নিরপেক্ষ -->
    <pardef n="নিরপেক্ষ__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- যোগ্যতর; যোগ্য -->
    <pardef n="যোগ্য/তর__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>তর<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- প্রথম; প্রথম -->
    <pardef n="প্রথম__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- নিষ্ক্রিয়; নিষ্ক্রিয় -->
    <pardef n="নিষ্ক্রিয়__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- অলৌকিক; অলৌকিক -->
    <pardef n="অলৌকিক__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- বৈজ্ঞানিক; বৈজ্ঞানিক -->
    <pardef n="বৈজ্ঞানিক__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- সমার্থক; সমার্থক -->
    <pardef n="সমার্থক__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- সাম্প্রতিকতম; সাম্প্রতিক -->
    <pardef n="সাম্প্রতিক/তম__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>তম<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- দক্ষ; দক্ষ -->
    <pardef n="দক্ষ__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- সুখী; সুখী -->
    <pardef n="সুখী__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- সাম্প্রতিকতর; সাম্প্রতিক -->
    <pardef n="সাম্প্রতিক/তর__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>তর<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ১৩তম; ১৩তম -->
    <pardef n="১৩তম__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- দশম; দশম -->
    <pardef n="দশম__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- শক্তিশালী; শক্তিশালী -->
    <pardef n="শক্তিশালী__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- নাটকীয়; নাটকীয় -->
    <pardef n="নাটকীয়__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- অক্ষত; অক্ষত -->
    <pardef n="অক্ষত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- বলিষ্ঠতর; বলিষ্ঠ -->
    <pardef n="বলিষ্ঠ/তর__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>তর<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- নিপুণ; নিপুণ -->
    <pardef n="নিপুণ__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- অলসতর; অলস -->
    <pardef n="অলস/তর__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>তর<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="সস্তা"><i>সস্তা</i><par n="সস্তা__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="দিনব্যাপী"><i>দিনব্যাপী</i><par n="দিনব্যাপী__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="উত্তর-পূর্ব"><i>উত্তর-পূর্ব</i><par n="উত্তর-পূর্ব__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="দ্বিবার্ষিক"><i>দ্বিবার্ষিক</i><par n="দ্বিবার্ষিক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="প্রতিভাবান"><i>প্রতিভাবান</i><par n="প্রতিভাবান__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="মধ্যবর্তী"><i>মধ্যবর্তী</i><par n="মধ্যবর্তী__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সম্পন্ন"><i>সম্পন্ন</i><par n="সম্পন্ন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="অষ্টম"><i>অষ্টম</i><par n="অষ্টম__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="শুভ"><i>শুভ</i><par n="শুভ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="আনন্দিত"><i>আনন্দিত</i><par n="আনন্দিত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="মসৃণ"><i>মসৃণ</i><par n="মসৃণ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="বিশ্বাসী"><i>বিশ্বাসী</i><par n="বিশ্বাসী__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="নিয়োজিত"><i>নিয়োজিত</i><par n="নিয়োজিত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="অযোগ্য"><i>অযোগ্য</i><par n="অযোগ্য__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ঘৃণ্যতম"><i>ঘৃণ্য</i><par n="ঘৃণ্য/তম__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="বেসামরিক"><i>বেসামরিক</i><par n="বেসামরিক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="মুসলিম"><i>মুসলিম</i><par n="মুসলিম__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="বিতর্কিত"><i>বিতর্কিত</i><par n="বিতর্কিত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="পুরো"><i>পুরো</i><par n="পুরো__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="যোগ্যতম"><i>যোগ্য</i><par n="যোগ্য/তম__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="জনপ্রিয়"><i>জনপ্রিয়</i><par n="জনপ্রিয়__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সহজাত"><i>সহজাত</i><par n="সহজাত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সচ্ছল"><i>সচ্ছল</i><par n="সচ্ছল__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="প্রদর্শিত"><i>প্রদর্শিত</i><par n="প্রদর্শিত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="নিরপেক্ষ"><i>নিরপেক্ষ</i><par n="নিরপেক্ষ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="যোগ্যতর"><i>যোগ্য</i><par n="যোগ্য/তর__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="প্রথম"><i>প্রথম</i><par n="প্রথম__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="নিষ্ক্রিয়"><i>নিষ্ক্রিয়</i><par n="নিষ্ক্রিয়__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="অলৌকিক"><i>অলৌকিক</i><par n="অলৌকিক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="বৈজ্ঞানিক"><i>বৈজ্ঞানিক</i><par n="বৈজ্ঞানিক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সমার্থক"><i>সমার্থক</i><par n="সমার্থক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সাম্প্রতিকতম"><i>সাম্প্রতিক</i><par n="সাম্প্রতিক/তম__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="দক্ষ"><i>দক্ষ</i><par n="দক্ষ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সুখী"><i>সুখী</i><par n="সুখী__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সাম্প্রতিকতর"><i>সাম্প্রতিক</i><par n="সাম্প্রতিক/তর__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="১৩তম"><i>১৩তম</i><par n="১৩তম__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="দশম"><i>দশম</i><par n="দশম__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="শক্তিশালী"><i>শক্তিশালী</i><par n="শক্তিশালী__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="নাটকীয়"><i>নাটকীয়</i><par n="নাটকীয়__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="অক্ষত"><i>অক্ষত</i><par n="অক্ষত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="বলিষ্ঠতর"><i>বলিষ্ঠ</i><par n="বলিষ্ঠ/তর__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="নিপুণ"><i>নিপুণ</i><par n="নিপুণ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="অলসতর"><i>অলস</i><par n="অলস/তর__adj"/></e>
